Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.827

Anaphylaxis occurring in educational settings—Standing order for epinephrine.

The secretary or the secretary's designee, if a licensed health professional with the authority to prescribe epinephrine, shall, as is consistent with the exercise of sound professional judgment, issue a statewide standing order prescribing epinephrine and epinephrine autoinjectors to any school district or school for use by a school nurse or other designated trained school personnel, as authorized under RCW 28A.210.383, for any student or individual experiencing anaphylaxis on school property, a school bus, a field trip, or designated school activity.

[ 2024 c 81 s 1.]